Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 11.001. DEFINITIONS. In this title:

(1) "Assistance" means all forms of assistance and services for needy persons authorized by Subtitle C.

(2) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(3) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

(4) "Financial assistance" means money payments for needy persons authorized by Chapter 31.

(5) "Medical assistance" means assistance for needy persons authorized by Chapter 32.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2335, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8.012, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 920, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 980, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1505, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2005.

Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 592, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 1.28(3), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 11.002. PURPOSE OF TITLE; CONSTRUCTION. (a) The purpose of this title is to establish a program of social security to provide necessary and prompt assistance to the citizens of this state who are entitled to avail themselves of its provisions.

(b) This title shall be liberally construed in order that its purposes may be accomplished as equitably, economically, and expeditiously as possible.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2335, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 11.003. RESPONSIBILITY OF COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES NOT AFFECTED. No provision of this title is intended to release the counties and municipalities in this state from the specific responsibilities they have with regard to the support of public welfare, child welfare, and relief services. Funds which the counties and municipalities may appropriate for the support of those programs may be administered through the local or regional offices of the commission or Department of Aging and Disability Services, and if administered in that manner must be devoted exclusively to the programs in the county or municipality making the appropriation.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2335, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 11.004. POWERS AND FUNCTIONS NOT AFFECTED. The provisions of this title are not intended to interfere with the powers and functions of the commission, the health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 521.0001, Government Code, or county juvenile boards.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2336, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 793, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.72, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 11.004. POWERS AND FUNCTIONS NOT AFFECTED. The provisions of this title are not intended to interfere with the powers and functions of the commission, the health and human services agencies, as defined by Section 531.001, Government Code, or county juvenile boards.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2336, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 793, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.002, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.72, eff. April 1, 2025.